Idaho, session 2025, H0089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1402. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" means a registered nurse
licensed in this state who has gained additional specialized knowledge,
skills and experience through a program of study recognized or defined by
the board. An advanced practice registered nurse is authorized to perform
advanced nursing practice, which may include the prescribing, administer-
ing and dispensing of therapeutic pharmacologic agents, as defined by board
rules. An advanced practice registered nurse shall perform only those acts
as provided by the board and for which the individual is educationally pre-
pared. Advanced practice registered nurses shall include the following four
(4) roles: certified nurse-midwife; clinical nurse specialist; certified
nurse practitioner; and certified registered nurse anesthetist as defined
in board rule. An advanced practice registered nurse collaborates with
other health professionals in providing health care.
(2) "Board" means the board of nursing.
(3) "Licensed practical nurse" means a person licensed by the board who
practices nursing by:
(a) Functioning at the direction of a licensed registered nurse, li-
censed advanced practice registered nurse, licensed physician, or li-
censed dentist in a role falling within the nurse's scope of practice as
defined by the board;
(b) Contributing to the Performing appropriate delegated focused as-
sessments of the health status of individuals and groups of individu-
als;
(c) Participating in the development and modification of the strategy
of care;
(d) Implementing the appropriate aspects of the strategy of care as de-
fined by the board, including administering medications and treatments
as prescribed by those health care providers authorized to prescribe
medication;
(e) Maintaining safe and effective nursing care rendered directly or
indirectly;
(f) Participating in the evaluation of responses to interventions; and
(g) Delegating nursing interventions that may be performed by others
and that do not conflict with this chapter.


(4) "Licensed registered nurse" means a person licensed by the board
who practices nursing by:
(a) Assessing the health status of individuals and groups of individu-
als;
(b) Identifying health care problems that are amenable to nursing in-
tervention;
(c) Establishing goals to meet identified health care needs;
(d) Planning a strategy of care;
(e) Prescribing nursing interventions to implement the strategy of
care;
(f) Implementing the strategy of care, including administering medi-
cations and treatments as prescribed by those health care providers au-
thorized to prescribe medication;
(g) Authorizing nursing interventions that may be performed by others
and that do not conflict with this chapter;
(h) Maintaining safe and effective nursing care rendered directly or
indirectly;
(i) Evaluating responses to interventions;
(j) Teaching the theory and practice of nursing;
(k) Managing the practice of nursing; and
(l) Collaborating with other health professionals in the management of
health care.
(5) "Nursing education program" means a course of instruction offered
and conducted to prepare persons for the practice of nursing, or to increase
the knowledge and skills of the practicing nurse.
(6) "Practice of nursing" means the performance by licensed practi-
cal nurses, registered nurses and advanced practice registered nurses of
acts and services that require formal nursing education and specialized
knowledge, judgment and skill, which acts and services assist individuals,
groups, communities and populations in order to promote, maintain or re-
store optimal health and well-being throughout the life process. Nursing
practice encompasses a broad continuum of services delivered in health care
and non-health care environments for remuneration or as volunteer service.
Nursing practice may be clinical as well as nonclinical in a variety of ar-
eas including, but not limited to, education, administration, research and
public service. Nursing practice occurs at the physical location of the
recipient.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.